Mississippi, session 2026, SB2595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Chapter 386, Laws of 2017, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 449, Laws of 2018, as amended by Sections 1 and 2, Chapter 363, Laws of 2019, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 412, Laws of 2022, is amended as follows: Section 1.  (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration may transfer and convey to the Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority certain real property located at Columbia Training School in Marion County, Mississippi.  The real property contains approximately two hundred four (204) acres, more or less, lying North of Highway 44 and is more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the Southwest corner of Section 22, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, Marion County, Mississippi; thence run north along said section line a distance of 3,350 feet, more or less, to the south boundary of a parcel owned by The City of Columbia; thence continue to run along parcel boundary east a distance of 1,320 feet, more or less, thence continue to run along said City of Columbia parcel boundary north a distance of 1,612 feet, more or less, to the Point of Beginning; thence run N 61°40'00" E a distance of 4,470 feet, more or less, to the east boundary of Section 15; thence run along said Section line north a distance of 2,954 feet, more or less; thence leaving said Section line run S 48°06'08" W a distance of 5,296 feet, more or less, to the east boundary of a parcel owned by The City of Columbia; thence run along said boundary South a distance of 1,539 feet, more or less, back to the Point of Beginning.  Said parcel containing 204 acres, more or less, and being located in the South 1/2 and the NE 1/4 of Section 15, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, Marion County, Mississippi, and the NE 1/4 of the NW 1/4 of Section 22, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, Marion County, Mississippi. (2)  (a)  The Department of Finance and Administration may transfer and convey to the Marion County Economic Development District certain real property located at Columbia Training School in Marion County, Mississippi.  The real property contains approximately four hundred six (406) acres, more or less, lying North of Highway 44 and is more particularly described as follows: Beginning at the Southwest corner of Section 22, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, Marion County, Mississippi; thence run north along said section line a distance of 3,350 feet, more or less, to the south boundary of a parcel owned by The City of Columbia; thence run east a distance of 5,280 feet, more or less, to the east boundary of Section 22; thence run south along said section line a distance of 3,350 feet, more or less, to the southeast corner of Section 22; thence run west a distance of 5,280 feet, more or less, back to the Point of Beginning.  Said parcel containing 406 acres, more or less, and being located in the South 1/2 and the South 1/2 of the North 1/2 of Section 22, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, Marion County, Mississippi. (b)  (i)  The Marion County Economic Development District is authorized to transfer and convey without cost a certain portion of the real property described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) located at Columbia Training School in Marion County, Mississippi, to the Board of Supervisors of Marion County for the purpose of law enforcement training.  The real property contains approximately eighteen (18) acres, more or less, and is more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a found concrete marker at the Southwest corner of Section 22, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, Marion County, Mississippi; thence run along said section line North 00 degrees 04 minutes 43 seconds West a distance of 1,859.88 feet to the Point of Beginning of an easement described as follows:  Thence continue North 00 degrees 04 minutes 43 seconds West a distance of 1,484.29 feet; thence run North 89 degrees 44 minutes 14 seconds East a distance of 1,060.04 feet, thence run South 35 degrees 23 minutes 33 seconds West a distance of 1,826.72 feet, back to the Point of Beginning; said easement containing 18.0 acres, more or less, and being located in the NW 1/4 of the SW 1/4 and the SW 1/4 of the NW 1/4 of Section 22, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, Marion County, Mississippi. (ii)  The property transaction authorized in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (b) shall not be subject to the monetary consideration requirements set forth in Section 19-5-99(5)(a). Additionally, the property transferred and conveyed under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (b) shall not be subject to the use restrictions set forth in Section 19-5-99(5)(a) and in subsection (3) of this section. (3)  The aggregate of parcels described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section consists of six hundred ten (610) acres, more or less, of the Columbia Training School Property, which the entirety of such section whereon the named property is situated consists of one thousand eight hundred twenty-three (1,823) acres, more or less.  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, the remaining property transferred and conveyed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall only be used to make improvements to the Marion County Airport and to construct an adjacent industrial park or other aviation-related facility. (4)  The State of Mississippi shall retain any mineral rights to the property transferred and conveyed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to correct any discrepancies in the property descriptions provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. (5)  (a)  The parcels of property conveyed under this section must be conveyed to the Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority and to the Marion County Economic Development District without any assumption of liability or financial responsibility by the State of Mississippi for any known or unknown environmental defects contained thereon. Upon receipt of the deed of title to the property, the respective recipients, in their individual capacities, shall indemnify the State of Mississippi for any damage, injury or loss. (b)  The Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority and the Marion County Economic Development District shall provide the Mississippi Department of Human Services six (6) months to harvest and sell any timber located on the property transferred using a company of the department's preference prior to any improvement or development being made on the property by such entities, the revenue generated from which shall be deposited into the State Treasury and earmarked for use by the Department of Human Services for all administrative and program purposes deemed necessary by the executive director.  Upon harvesting the timber upon the property within the time specified in this paragraph, the department shall forfeit all future rights to any timber remaining on or regrown on the property, as well as any right of easement for accessing the land. (6)  The Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority and the Marion County Economic Development District shall each grant the Department of Human Services an easement of ingress and egress to access the remaining parcels of property retained by the Department of Human Services if reasonable access to such remaining parcels is not otherwise available. Section 2.  (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting on behalf of the Mississippi Department of Human Services, is authorized to transfer and convey to the Marion County Economic Development District certain real property located at Columbia Training School in Marion County, Mississippi, for the purpose of providing unobstructed access for the industrial development of the Marion County AirPlex on the property transferred under subsection (2)(a) of Section 1 of this chapter.  The real property contains approximately forty (40) acres, more or less, and is more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a found concrete monument at the Southeast corner of Section 21, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, Marion County, Mississippi, and run westerly along the southern boundary of Section 21 for a distance of 975.58 feet, more or less, to the easternmost right-of-way line of Airport Road.  Thence run in a southeasterly direction along said right-of-way line the following calls; run along a curve to the right having an arc length of 261.47 feet, a radius of 735.00 feet, a chord distance of 260.09 feet, and a chord bearing of South 31 degrees 52 minutes 25 seconds East; thence continue along said right-of-way line South 21 degrees 40 minutes 56 seconds East a distance of 1,480.92 feet; thence leaving said right-of-way line run North 43 degrees 58 minutes 36 seconds East a distance of 2,219.24 feet, more or less, to the north boundary line of Section 27; thence run westerly along said north boundary line of Section 27 for a distance of 1,249.87 feet back to the Point of Beginning.  Said parcel containing 40.0 acres, more or less, and being located in the SE 1/4 of the NE 1/4 of Section 28 and the NE 1/4 of the NE 1/4 of Section 28 and the SE 1/4 of the NE 1/4 of Section 28 and the NW 1/4 of the NW 1/4 of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, Marion County, Mississippi. (2)  The State of Mississippi shall retain any mineral rights to the property transferred and conveyed under subsection (1) of this section.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to correct any discrepancies in the property descriptions provided in subsection (1) of this section. (3)  The parcels of property conveyed under this section must be conveyed to the Marion County Economic Development District without any assumption of liability or financial responsibility by the State of Mississippi for any known or unknown environmental defects contained thereon.  Upon receipt of the deed of title to the property, the Marion County Economic Development District shall indemnify the State of Mississippi for any damage, injury or loss. Section 3.  (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer and convey to the Marion County Economic Development District certain real property located at Columbia Training School in Marion County, Mississippi.  The real property contains approximately 1,148.92 acres, more or less, and is more particularly described as follows: Parcel 1 Description: Commencing at a found iron pin at the Northwest Corner of Section 15, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 88 degrees 44 minutes 13 seconds East a distance of 1,320.20 feet to the NE corner of the NW ¼ of the of the NW ¼ of Section 15, Township 4 North, Range 18 West and the point beginning, thence South 88 degrees 44 minutes 13 seconds East a distance of 4,066.30 feet to the NE corner of Section 15, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 00 degrees 05 minutes 56 seconds West a distance of 242.83 feet along the East line of Section 15, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 47 degrees 12 minutes 45 seconds West a distance of 4,789.95 feet along the north boundary of the Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority property, thence South 44 degrees 56 minutes 53 seconds West a distance of 761.75 feet along the north boundary of the Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority property to the center of the SW ¼ of Section 15, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence North 00 degrees 09 minutes 35 seconds East a distance of 4,125.33 feet to the NE corner of the NW ¼ of the NW ¼ of Section 15, Township 4 North, Range 18 West back to an iron pin and the point of beginning, Said parcel containing 202.11 acres, more or less. Parcel 2 Description: Commencing at a found pine stake at the Southeast Corner of the SE ¼ of the NE ¼ of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence North 00 degrees 05 minutes 56 seconds East a distance of 6,028.64 feet to a point on the East line of Section 22, Township 4 North, Range 18 West to the point beginning, thence South 89 degrees 44 minutes 33 seconds West a distance of 4,068.43 feet to the SE corner of the N ½ of the SW ¼ of the of the NW ¼ of Section 22, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence North 00 degrees 49 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 1,648.69 feet to the South boundary of Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority Property, thence North 62 degrees 00 minutes 33 seconds East a distance of 181.98 feet along the South boundary of the Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority Property, thence North 62 degrees 00 minutes 33 seconds East a distance of 1,448.60 feet along the South boundary of the Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority Property, thence North 59 degrees 44 minutes 40 seconds East a distance of 3,023.35 feet along the South boundary of the Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority Property to a point on the East line of Section 15, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 00 degrees 05 minutes 56 seconds West a distance of 3,918.86 feet to a point on the east line of Section 22, Township 4 North, Range 18 West back to the point of beginning, Said parcel containing 256.81 acres, more or less. Parcel 3 Description: Beginning at a found pine stake at the Southeast Corner of the SE ¼ of the NE ¼ of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence North 89 degrees 42 minutes 39 seconds West a distance of 1,323.60 feet to the NW corner of the NE ¼ of the SW ¼ of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 00 degrees 23 minutes 21 seconds West a distance of 1,320.0 feet to the SW corner of the NE ¼ of the SE ¼ of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 89 degrees 42 minutes 39 seconds East a distance of 662.10 feet to the NE corner of the W ½ of the SE ¼ of the SE ¼ of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 00 degrees 23 minutes 21 seconds West a distance of 1,320.0 feet to the SE corner of the W ½ of the SE ¼ of the SE ¼ of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 89 degrees 42 minutes 37 seconds East a distance of 662.50 feet to the SE corner of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 00 degrees 23 minutes 21 seconds West a distance of 114.57 feet to a point on the north right of way line of Old Highway 44, thence South 84 degrees 05 minutes 37 seconds West a distance of 2,278.91 feet along said north right of way, thence South 82 degrees 30 minutes 32 seconds West a distance of 1,164.47 feet along said north right of way, thence South 73 degrees 56 minutes 48 seconds West a distance of 1,400.42 feet along said north right of way, thence South 64 degrees 06 minutes 42 seconds West a distance of 277.68 feet along said north right of way, thence South 38 degrees 11 minutes 49 seconds West a distance of 240.36 feet along said north right of way, thence South 38 degrees 11 minutes 49 seconds West a distance of 69.88 feet along said north right of way to the north line of the S ½ of the NW ¼ of Section 34, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence South 89 degrees 45 minutes 36 seconds West a distance of 127.05 feet to the NW corner of the S ½ of the NW ¼ of Section 34, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence North 00 degrees 04 minutes 10 seconds West a distance of 3,929.52 feet to the NW corner of the SW ¼ of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence North 89 degrees 49 minutes 47 seconds West a distance of 1,294.10 feet to the NE corner NW ¼ of the SE ¼ of Section 28, Township 4 North, Range 18 West, thence North 00 degrees 16 minutes 38 seconds West a distance of 2,649.20 feet to the NE corner of the W ½ of the NE ¼ of Section 28, Township 4 North, Range 18 West. thence East a distance of 265.82 feet to the west right of way line of Airport Road, thence along said west right of way line as follows: thence South 42 degrees 05 minutes 14 seconds East a distance of 107.03 feet, thence South 27 degrees 31 minutes 10 seconds East a distance of 185.56 feet, thence South 21 degrees 40 minutes 56 seconds East a distance of 1,482.37 feet, thence North 43 degrees 56 minutes 03 seconds East a distance of 497.83 feet crossing Airport Road and running along the south boundary of Marion County Economic Development District property, thence continuing along said south boundary North 43 degrees 58 minutes 36 seconds East a distance of 1,761.55 feet to the north line of Section 27 Township 4 North, Range 18 West. thence run East a distance of 4,097.68 feet to the NE corner of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 East, thence South 00 degrees 05 minutes 56 seconds West a distance of 2,684.70 feet along the east line of Section 27, Township 4 North, Range 18 West back to the point of beginning said parcel containing 690.0 acres, more or less. (2)  The State of Mississippi shall retain any mineral rights to the property transferred and conveyed under subsection (1) of this section.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to correct any discrepancies in the property descriptions provided in subsection (1) of this section. (3)  The parcels of property conveyed under this section must be conveyed to the Marion County Economic Development District without any assumption of liability or financial responsibility by the State of Mississippi for any known or unknown environmental defects contained thereon.  Upon receipt of the deed of title to the property, the Marion County Economic Development District shall indemnify the State of Mississippi for any damage, injury or loss. (4) * * *  Upon sale or conveyance of the parcels of property conveyed hereunder, the Marion County Economic Development District shall first be reimbursed for out‑of‑pocket expenses for development of the parcels of property for water, sewer, roads, bridges, and electrical, and any remaining funds from the sale or conveyance shall be divided equally between the Marion County Economic Development District and the state.  The Marion County Economic Development District is authorized to sell, lease, trade, exchange or otherwise dispose of these properties upon such terms and conditions, and for such considerations, with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, convenience and necessity, or other considerations found to be in the best interests of the public, pursuant to the authorization granted in Section 19-5-99(5)(a), Mississippi Code of 1972. * * * (5)  The parcels of property conveyed hereunder shall be sold for not less than the fair market value as determined by the average of at least two (2) appraisals by qualified appraisers, one (1) of which shall be selected by the Department of Finance and Administration and both of whom shall be certified and licensed by the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board. ( * * *65)  The Columbia-Marion County Airport Authority and the Marion County Economic Development District shall provide the Mississippi Department of Human Services six (6) months to harvest and sell any timber located on the property transferred using a company of the department's preference prior to any improvement or development being made on the property by such entities, the revenue generated from which shall be deposited into the State Treasury and earmarked for use by the Department of Human Services for all administrative and program purposes deemed necessary by the executive director.  Upon harvesting the timber on the property described in subsection (1) of this section within the time specified in this subsection ( * * *65), the Department of Human Services shall forfeit all future rights to any timber remaining on or regrown on the property, as well as any right of easement for accessing the property, and such rights shall then rest with the Marion County Economic Development District. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.